Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-155
Legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that there are children in temporary foster care situations who would benefit from the stability of adoption. It is the intent of the Legislature that such situations be accommodated through the use of adoptions involving exchange-of-information contracts between the department and the adoptive or biological parent or parents.

Laws 1988, LB 301, § 1.